California statutes. Education Code
(e) School librarians, personnel involved in operating media programs in local schools, and guidance counselors.

(f) Individuals from fields of professional competence in dealing with children needing special education because of physical or mental handicaps, specific learning disabilities, severe educational disadvantages, and limited English proficiency or because they are gifted or talented, and individuals from fields of professional competence in guidance and counseling.

(g) Parents, senior class high school students, and other interested members of the public.

(h) Leaders from private industry.

The State Board of Education upon recommendation from the Superintendent of Public Instruction may add to the 15 public members of the commission as required to fully conform to federal legislation and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 10.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

33503.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission pursuant to Section 33502 shall have the powers and duties of a joint legislative committee on the subject of educational innovation and planning and shall meet with, and participate in, the work of the commission to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their positions as Members of the Legislature.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33504.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his representative shall serve as executive secretary to the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33505.

The commission, in carrying out its powers and duties, shall utilize the staff of the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33506.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except that they shall receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties and responsibilities, including traveling expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33507.

The commission shall select one of its members to be chairman of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33508.

Commission members shall serve for four-year terms and shall be eligible to serve more than one full term, except in the case of student representatives who shall serve a one-year term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

33509.

As used in this article:

(a) “Commission” means the Educational Innovation and Planning Commission. 

(b) “Title IV” means Title IV, Parts A, B, C, and D of the Educational Amendments of 1978 (Public Law 95-561) as amended.

(c) “State plan” means the plan for the use of Title IV funds as approved by the State Board of Education.

(d) “Secondary schools,” notwithstanding Section 52, shall not include community colleges.

(e) “Local educational agency” means the governing body of any school district, county office of education, or state special school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

33510.

For purposes of this article, the commission shall have the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a state advisory council prescribed in Title IV.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 13.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

33511.

The commission may do all of the following:

(a) Advise the state educational agency on the preparation of, and policy matters arising in the administration of, the state plan, including the development of criteria for the distribution of funds and the approval of applications for assistance under Title IV.

(b) Assist the State Board of Education and the Department of Education in the planning, development, and improvement of educational programs.

(c) Evaluate all programs and projects assisted under Title IV.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

33512.

All projects recommended by the commission shall be submitted to the State Board of Education for its approval.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33513.

The State Board of Education shall allocate funds under Title IV, Part C, to provide to the extent feasible a geographical spread of experimental projects in the state. All such grants for a particular project shall be limited to a five-year period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 15.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

33514.

The State Board of Education shall annually allocate, insofar as practicable, 15 percent of the total amount of federal funds received by the State of California pursuant to Title IV, Part C for special education projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 16.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

33516.

In order to be deemed an approved project and be eligible to receive an allocation from the State Board of Education, an experimental, demonstration, or operational project shall meet the following criteria:

(a) The proposed activities are not activities presently being performed by other state and federal programs.

(b) The proposed activities supplement, but do not supplant, other state or federal programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33518.

The State Board of Education may reserve a sum of money, to be recommended by the commission and approved by the State Board of Education, to support demonstration and experimental projects designed to develop new methods of allocating personnel, equipment, and facilities to solve educational problems associated with educational management. Such projects may include, but need not be limited to, the development of new and potentially more economical staffing, arrangements for administration and for classroom instruction, a modification of class size in schools, the utilization of classroom aides, flexible class scheduling, and the use of instructional television and audiovisual equipment so as to more effectively utilize local resources. Also included may be projects for educational problems associated with general curriculum development, community relations, urbanization, and work-study programs. The standards for such demonstrational and experimental projects shall be recommended by the commission and approved by the State Board of Education, based upon the best interests of the students involved, except that a project shall be approved only if it can be shown that, if successful, the cost effectiveness of the project will be such so as to be adaptable within the budgets of other similar school districts throughout the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33522.

The State Board of Education shall reserve not more than 15 percent of the state’s federal allocation under Title IV, Part C, for grants to the local educational agencies which have operated exemplary projects during the preceding year. Such funds shall be used by such local educational agencies to expand the projects locally and for diffusion of such successful projects statewide. A local education agency whose project is selected for diffusion is hereby designated as agent for all local education agencies in California for purposes of ESEA Title IV, Part C, diffusion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1354, Sec. 21.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.  Instructional Quality Commission [33530. - 33548.]

33530.

(a) There is in the state government the Instructional Quality Commission consisting of a Member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, a Member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, one public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, one public member appointed by the Governor, and 13 public members appointed by the state board upon the recommendation of the Superintendent or the members of the state board.

(b) So far as is practical and consistent with the duties assigned to the commission by the state board, at least seven of the 13 public members appointed by the state board shall be persons who, because they have taught, written, or lectured on the subject matter fields specified in Section 33533, in the course of public or private employment, have become recognized
 authorities or experienced practitioners in those fields. The state board shall make its appointments to ensure that, at any one time, at least
 seven of the public members shall be current classroom teachers, or mentor teachers, or both assigned to teach kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(c) Notwithstanding the requirement that seven of the public members shall be current classroom teachers or mentor teachers, current members of the commission who were appointed on or before December 31, 1989, shall be allowed to complete their terms.

(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the state board to consider appointing a pupil to the commission, using the current appointment process.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 1020 of the Government Code, if the state board elects to appoint a pupil to the commission, the pupil shall meet both of the
 following criteria:

(A) The pupil has been enrolled in a California high school for a minimum of two consecutive years.

(B) The pupil is in good standing.

(e) In making the remaining appointments to the commission, and in establishing the commission’s advisory task forces or committees, the state board is encouraged to consider the role of other representatives of the educational community in the development of curriculum and instructional materials, including, but not limited to, administrators, governing school board members,
 pupils, and parents who are reflective of the various ethnic groups and types of school districts in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 441, Sec. 1.   (AB 1204)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

33531.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission pursuant to Section 33530 shall have the powers and duties of a joint legislative committee on the subject of curriculum development and supplemental materials and shall meet with, and participate in, the work of the commission to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their positions as Members of the Legislature.

The Members of the Legislature appointed to the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33532.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), each commission member shall serve for a four-year term and shall not be eligible to serve more than one full term. Prior service on the commission for a term of less than three years resulting from an initial appointment or an appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term shall not be counted as a full term.

(2) A pupil member of the commission shall serve for a one-year term and shall not be eligible to serve more than one full term. The pupil member shall be a voting member with the full rights and duties of the other members of the commission.

(b) With respect to the appointment of 13 public members by the state board to the first commission, four shall be appointed for terms of two years, four shall be appointed for terms of three years, and five shall be appointed for a term of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 441, Sec. 2.   (AB 1204)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

33533.

The Superintendent and the state board shall consider for membership on the commission persons representing subjects commonly taught in public schools, including:

(a) English.

(b) Social sciences.

(c) World languages.

(d) Science.

(e) Mathematics.

(f) Visual and performing arts.

(g) Applied arts.

(h) Conservation education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 6.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

33534.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his representative shall serve as executive secretary to the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33535.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation, except that they shall receive their actual and necessary travel expenses in attending meetings of the commission and in attending meetings of any committee or subcommittee of the commission of which they are members. Expenses of the commission shall be paid out of appropriations made to the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33536.

The commission shall select one of its members to be chairman of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33537.

Whenever an employee of any public school district, state college, or other public agency is appointed to membership on the commission, his employer shall grant him sufficient time away from his regular duties, without loss of income or other benefits to which he is entitled by reason of his employment, to attend meetings of the commission and to attend to the duties imposed upon him by reason of his membership on the commission. The employer of any such member may make available such stenographic, secretarial, and staff assistance as is reasonably necessary to enable him to execute the duties imposed upon him by reason of his membership on the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33538.

The commission shall study problems of courses of study in the schools of the state and shall, upon request of the State Board of Education, recommend to the State Board of Education the adoption of minimum standards for courses of study in preschool, kindergarten, elementary, and secondary schools. Courses of study in the public schools shall conform to such minimum standards when adopted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33539.

As used in this article, “commission” means the Instructional Quality Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 608, Sec. 4.   (AB 250)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

33540.

(a) The state board and the department shall request that the commission review and revise, as necessary, the course requirements in the history-social science framework developed by the History-Social Science Curriculum Framework and Criteria Committee of the state board to ensure that minimum standards for courses in American government and civics include sufficient attention to teaching pupils how to interact, in a practical manner, with state and local governmental agencies and representatives to solve problems and to petition for changes in laws and procedures, and that the course requirements in the history-social science framework are also included in all history and social science courses and all grade levels, as appropriate.

(b) Whenever the history-social science framework is revised as required by law, the commission shall do, as appropriate and based on the subject matter of the course, all of the following:

(1) Receive input from civics learning experts, including civics education program providers, associations of civics educators, and organizations dedicated to research on civics learning, for purposes of integrating civics learning content, concepts, and skills, at all appropriate grade levels, with the standards established by the state board in core curriculum areas, as specified in Section 60605, as that section read on June 30, 2011, and Section 60605.8.

(2) Consider how civics and history instruction, at all appropriate grade levels, includes, in addition to the acquisition of content knowledge, the application of that content to develop the competence and skills needed for
 civic engagement.

(3) Ensure that voter education information is included in the American government and civics curriculum at the high school level, including, but not limited to, information on the importance of registering to vote in local, state, and federal elections, how to register to vote, both online and by mail, what the requirements are to register to vote, how to request an absentee ballot, how to fill out and return an absentee ballot, what to expect on election day, how to find a polling place, and where and how to access and understand the voter information pamphlet and other materials to become an informed voter.

(4) Ensure the following historical documents are incorporated into the framework:

(A) The Declaration of Independence.

(B) The
 United States Constitution, including the Bill of Rights.

(C) The Federalist Papers.

(D) The Emancipation Proclamation.

(E) The Gettysburg Address.

(F) George Washington’s Farewell Address.

(5) Consider incorporating the following historical documents into the framework:

(A) The Magna Carta.

(B) The Articles of Confederation.

(C) The California Constitution.

(6) Encourage instruction that promotes an understanding of the governments
 of California and the United States of America, including, but not limited to, the development of democracy and the history of the development of the United States Constitution.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, for purposes of the history-social science framework that is revised any time after January 1, 2015, that the commission consider whether and how to incorporate the College, Career, and Civic Life (C3) Framework for Social Studies State Standards into that framework.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, for purposes of only the history-social science framework that is revised after January 1, 2015, that the requirements imposed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) may be satisfied under the framework adoption procedures currently being used by the department as of January 1, 2015.

(e) When the history-social science content standards are next revised after January 1, 2015, the state board shall consider incorporating the College, Career, and Civic Life (C3) Framework for Social Studies State Standards into the history-social science content standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 897)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

33540.2.

(a) The department shall, no later than March 1, 2022, in collaboration with, and subject to the approval of, the executive director of the state board, use the funding appropriated pursuant to Section 156 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021 to enter into a contract with a county office of education or a consortium of county offices of education for the purposes of developing a model curriculum related to the Vietnamese American refugee experience by September 1, 2024. The model curriculum shall be housed on the platform developed and maintained by the California History-Social Science Project. The designated county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall work with the California History-Social Science Project and
 Teaching California to ensure that the curriculum is accessible and compatible with the platform.

(b) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall ensure the inclusion of authentic voices and perspectives in the development of the model curriculum and shall provide multiple opportunities for authentic stakeholder engagement across the state, which shall include, but not be limited to, town halls or other input sessions and surveys. The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall consult with, but is not limited to consulting with, Vietnamese American cultural centers and community groups located in California, survivors, rescuers, and liberators of the Vietnam War, Vietnamese American refugees, representatives of local educational agencies, members of the commission,
 and teachers, including teachers who have relevant experience or educational backgrounds in the study and teaching of Vietnamese American history.

(c) (1) The model curriculum shall include the incorporation of writings and other media that represent all perspectives of the Vietnamese refugee experience, including oral testimony by survivors, rescuers, and liberators of the Vietnam War, including Vietnamese American refugees, Vietnamese boat people, and members of the Republic of Vietnam Armed Forces, to ensure quality standards and materials for this area of study.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “oral testimony” means the firsthand accounts of significant historical events presented in a format that includes, but is not limited to, in-person testimony, video,
 or a multimedia option, such as a DVD or an online video.

(d) The model curriculum shall be open source and accessible to educators across the state and shall include curriculum and online instructional modules appropriate for use with pupils in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(e) The model curriculum shall be written as a guide to allow school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education to adapt their related courses to best meet the educational needs of their communities. The model curriculum developed for use in high schools shall include examples of courses offered by local educational agencies that have been approved as meeting the A–G admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, including,
 to the extent possible, course outlines for those courses.

(f) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education may subcontract with a nonprofit organization or institution of higher education in the development of the model curriculum pursuant to this section.

(g) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall submit a report annually, until the completion of the model curriculum, on its progress in the development of the model curriculum, to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and to the state board.

(h) Beginning in the school year following the completion of the model curriculum pursuant to subdivision (a), each school district, charter school, or county office of education maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that does not otherwise offer standards-based curriculum relative to the Vietnamese American refugee experience, Vietnamese boat people, and the Republic of Vietnam Armed Forces, is encouraged to offer to pupils a course of study relative to the Vietnamese American refugee experience. A school district, charter school, or county office of education that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, that elects to offer a course of study in the Vietnamese American refugee experience pursuant to this subdivision, shall offer the course as an elective in the social sciences or world history and
 shall make the course available in at least one year during a pupil’s enrollment in grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies that maintain high schools submit course outlines for studies relative to the Vietnamese American refugee experience for approval as A–G courses.

(j) For purposes of this section, “model curriculum” means lesson plans, primary source documents, planning resources, teaching strategies, and professional development activities to assist teachers in teaching about the Vietnamese American refugee experience, the Fall of Saigon in 1975, discussion of the Vietnamese boat people and members of the Republic of Vietnam Armed Forces, the reasons behind the exodus, the hardships faced by the Vietnamese
 people attempting to flee who were apprehended by the communist government, and the conditions that led to the resettlement of Vietnamese people in the United States and covers the period from the Vietnam War and the Fall of Saigon in 1975 to the year 2000, which captures the experience of postwar Vietnamese immigrants in the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 711, Sec. 1.   (SB 369)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33540.4.

(a) The department shall, no later than April 1, 2022, in collaboration with, and subject to the approval of, the executive director of the state board, use the funding appropriated pursuant to Section 156 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021 to enter into a contract with a county office of education or a consortium of county offices of education for the purposes of developing a model curriculum related to Cambodian American history and heritage by September 1, 2024. The model curriculum shall be
 housed on the platform developed and maintained by the California History-Social Science Project. The designated county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall work with the California History-Social Science Project and Teaching California to ensure that the curriculum is accessible and compatible with the platform.

(b) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall ensure the inclusion of a myriad of voices and perspectives in the development of the model curriculum and shall provide opportunities for
 stakeholders’ active engagement and participation across the state, which shall include, but not be limited to, town halls, community forums, and other forms of input. The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall consult with, but is not limited to consulting with,
 Cambodian Americans that span generations and have diverse social backgrounds, including educators, scholars, students, and artistic, creative, cultural, and religious groups.

(c) The model curriculum shall include the incorporation of tangible and intangible expressions, including, but not limited to, writings, media, other artistic, cultural, and historical artifacts, multigenerational storytelling, and oral history that represent
 Cambodian American history and heritage to ensure quality standards and materials for this area of study.

(d) The model curriculum shall be open source and accessible to educators across the state and shall include curriculum and online instructional modules appropriate for use
 with pupils in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(e) The model curriculum shall be written as a guide to allow school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education to adapt their related courses to accommodate the educational needs of their communities. The model curriculum developed for use in high schools shall include examples of courses offered by local educational agencies that have been approved as meeting the A–G admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, including, to the extent possible, course outlines for those courses.

(f) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education may subcontract with nonprofit organizations or institutions of higher
 education in the development of the model curriculum pursuant to this section.

(g) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall submit a report annually, until the completion of the model curriculum, on its progress in the development of the model curriculum, to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and to the state board.

(h) Beginning in the school year following the completion of the model curriculum pursuant to subdivision (a), each school district, charter school, or county office of education maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that does not otherwise offer standards-based curriculum relative to Cambodian American history and heritage is encouraged to offer to pupils a course of study relative to Cambodian American history and heritage based on the model curriculum. A school district, charter school, or county office of education that serves pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, that elects to offer a course of study in Cambodian
 American history and heritage
 pursuant to this subdivision, shall offer the course as an elective in the social sciences or world history and shall make the course available in at least one year during a pupil’s enrollment in grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies that maintain high schools submit course outlines for studies relative to Cambodian American history and heritage for approval as A–G courses.

(j) For purposes of this section, “model curriculum” means lesson plans,
 primary source documents, planning resources, teaching strategies, and professional development activities to assist teachers in teaching about Cambodian American history and heritage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 711, Sec. 2.   (SB 369)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33540.6.

(a) The department shall, no later than May 1, 2022, in collaboration with, and subject to the approval of, the executive director of the state board, use the funding appropriated pursuant to Section 156 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021 to enter into a contract with a county office of education or a consortium of county offices of education for the purposes of developing a model curriculum related to Hmong history and cultural studies by September 1, 2024. The model curriculum shall be housed on the platform developed and maintained by the California History-Social Science Project. The designated county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall work with the California History-Social Science Project and Teaching California to ensure that the curriculum is accessible and compatible with the
 platform.

(b) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall ensure the inclusion of authentic voices and perspectives in the development of the model curriculum and shall provide multiple opportunities for authentic stakeholder engagement across the state, which shall include, but not be limited to, town halls or other input sessions and surveys. The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education shall consult with representatives of Hmong advocacy, community, social, and cultural organizations; faculty of Hmong studies programs at universities and colleges; members of the commission; representatives of local educational agencies; and teachers, including teachers of kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, who have relevant experiences or educational backgrounds in the study and teaching of Hmong studies. The model curriculum shall identify the ways in which the model curriculum
 aligns with, and is supportive of, the common core academic content standards and of the goals of the curriculum framework in history-social science adopted by the state board in 2016.

(c) The model curriculum shall include examples of courses offered by local educational agencies that have been approved as meeting the A–G admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, including, to the extent possible, course outlines for those courses.

(d) The model curriculum shall address, but shall not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The history of the Hmong people who lived in Laos, Thailand, Vietnam, and China.

(2) The history of the Hmong migration to the United States and California, as well as
 other parts of the world.

(3) Cultural beliefs, practices, and traditions of the Hmong people, including, among other things, Hmong New Year celebrations, marriages, newborns, and funerals.

(4) Contributions of the Hmong people to California and the United States.

(5) The contributions and sacrifices of the Lao-Hmong and other Southeast Asians who served in the “Secret Army” in Laos, which was funded by the United States Central Intelligence Agency.

(e) The model curriculum shall be written as a guide to allow school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education to adapt their related courses to best meet the educational needs of their communities. The model curriculum developed for use in high schools shall include examples of courses
 offered by local educational agencies that have been approved as meeting the A–G admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, including, to the extent possible, course outlines for those courses.

(f) The county office of education or consortium of county offices of education may subcontract with a nonprofit organization or institution of higher education in the development of the model curriculum pursuant to this section.

(g) The county office of consortium or county offices of education shall submit a report annually, until the completion of the model curriculum, on its progress in the development of the model curriculum, to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and to the state board.

(h) Beginning in the school year following the completion
 of the model curriculum, local educational agencies are encouraged to use the model curriculum to provide instruction in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(i) Beginning in the school year following the completion of the model curriculum, each local educational agency maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that does not otherwise offer a standards-based Hmong studies curriculum is encouraged to offer to all otherwise qualified pupils a course of study in Hmong studies based on the model curriculum.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies submit course outlines for Hmong studies for approval as A–G courses.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency”
 means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(2) “Model curriculum” means lesson plans, primary source documents, planning resources, teaching strategies, and professional development activities to assist teachers in teaching about Hmong history pursuant to subdivision (d) and shall be open source and accessible to educators across the state and shall include curriculum and online instructional modules appropriate for use in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 6.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

33541.

(a) The State Board of Education and the department shall revise, as necessary, the framework in science to include the necessary elements to teach environmental education, including, but not limited to, all of the following topics:

(1) Integrated waste management.

(2) Energy conservation.

(3) Water conservation and pollution prevention.

(4) Air resources.

(5) Integrated pest management.

(6) Toxic materials.

(7) Wildlife conservation and forestry.

(b) The Office of Education and the Environment of the California Integrated Waste Management Board, established pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 71300) of Division 34 of the Public Resources Code, shall provide the State Board of Education and the department with available environmental information and materials to aid in implementing subdivision (a).

(c) Any recommended revisions in reference to the course requirements in science shall not be implemented until the commencement of the appropriate curriculum framework adoption cycle subsequent to the revision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 665, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

33542.

The commission and the state board shall ensure that the health and science curriculum frameworks adopted in the course of the next submission cycle following the date that this section becomes effective include the subject of organ procurement and tissue donation, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 582, Sec. 2.   (AB 1967)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

33543.

(a) During the next revision of the history-social science curriculum framework, the commission shall consider including, and recommending for adoption by
 the state board,
 instruction on the election of President Barack Obama and the significance of the United States electing its first African American President, as appropriate.

(b) The state board shall adopt, modify, or reject the curriculum framework recommended by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 286, Sec. 2.   (AB 1912)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

33544.

(a) When the “Health Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) is next revised after January 1, 2016, the commission shall consider including comprehensive information for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, on sexual harassment and violence that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Information on different forms of sexual harassment and violence, including instances that occur among peers and in a dating relationship; a discussion of prevention strategies; how pupils report sexual harassment and violence;
 and potential resources victims can access.

(2) Discussion of the affirmative consent standard, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 67386, and skills pupils use to establish boundaries in peer and dating relationships.

(3) Discussion of legal aspects of sexual harassment and violence under state and federal law.

(b) If the commission includes comprehensive information on sexual harassment and violence in the health framework, the commission shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Ensure information included in the framework is research based and appropriate for pupils of all races, genders, sexual orientations, gender identities, and ethnic and cultural backgrounds. This may include, but shall not be limited to, reviewing other states’ curricula.

(2) Consult with secondary health teachers and experts in sexual harassment and violence curriculum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   (SB 695)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

33545.

When the “Health Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) is next revised after January 1, 2015, the commission shall consider including a distinct category on sexual abuse and sex trafficking prevention education that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Information on different forms of sexual abuse and assault; discussion of prevention strategies; how to report sexual abuse or suspected sexual abuse; and local resources for victims.
